liblouis-back-translation-tables/en-us-g3-abk.ctb
word songster's 234-1345-1245-34-12456-3-234
word songsters 234-1345-1245-34-12456-234
word sonorous 234-1345-135-1235-1256-234
word sonorously 234-1345-135-1235-1256-234-123-13456
word sonorousness 234-1345-135-1235-1256-234-56-234
word sonorousness's 234-1345-135-1235-1256-234-56-234-3-234
word sonority 234-1345-135-1235-56-13456
word sonority's 234-1345-135-1235-56-13456-3-234
word sonar's 234-1345-345-3-234
word sonars 234-1345-345-234
word sonnies 234-1345-1345-24-15-234
word sonny's 234-1345-1345-13456-3-234
word son's 234-1345-3-234
word sons 234-1345-234
word sonsofbitches 234-1345-234-12356-12-24-2345-16-15-234
word sonata 234-1345-1-2345-1
word sonnet 234-1345-1345-15-2345
word sonatina 234-1345-1-2345-35-1
word sonatina's 234-1345-1-2345-35-1-3-234
word sonatinas 234-1345-1-2345-35-1-234
word sonata's 234-1345-1-2345-1-3-234
word sonatas 234-1345-1-2345-1-234
word sonnet's 234-1345-1345-15-2345-3-234
word sonnets 234-1345-1345-15-2345-234
word someone 234-5-135
word someone's 234-5-135-3-234
word someones 234-5-135-234
word something 234-1456-346
word something's 234-1456-346-3-234
word somethings 234-1456-346-234
word think 1456-13
word thinker 1456-13-12456
word thinkable 1456-13-1-3456
word thinking 1456-13-346
word thinking's 1456-13-346-3-234
word thinker's 1456-13-12456-3-234
word thinkers 1456-13-12456-234
word thinks 1456-13-234
word three 1456-1235
word threefold 1456-1235-124-135-123-145
word threepence 1456-1235-1234-56-15
word threepence's 1456-1235-1234-56-15-3-234
word three's 1456-1235-3-234
word threes 1456-1235-234
word threescore 1456-1235-234-14-135-1235-15
word threescore's 1456-1235-234-14-135-1235-15-3-234
word threescores 1456-1235-234-14-135-1235-15-234
word threesome 1456-1235-5-234
word threesome's 1456-1235-5-234-3-234
word threesomes 1456-1235-5-234-234
word turn 2345-1235-1345
word turner 2345-1235-1345-12456
word turnbuckle 2345-1235-1345-12-136-14-13-123-15
word turnbuckle's 2345-1235-1345-12-136-14-13-123-15-3-234
word turnbuckles 2345-1235-1345-12-136-14-13-123-15-234
word turnabout 2345-1235-1345-1-12-1256-2345
word turnabout's 2345-1235-1345-1-12-1256-2345-3-234
word turnabouts 2345-1235-1345-1-12-1256-2345-234
word turnoff 2345-1235-1345-12356-124
word turnover 2345-1235-1345-135-1236-12456
word turnoff's 2345-1235-1345-12356-124-3-234
word turnoffs 2345-1235-1345-12356-124-234
word turnover's 2345-1235-1345-135-1236-12456-3-234
word turnovers 2345-1235-1345-135-1236-12456-234
word turnkey 2345-1235-1345-13-15-13456
word turnkey's 2345-1235-1345-13-15-13456-3-234
word turnkeys 2345-1235-1345-13-15-13456-234
word turncoat 2345-1235-1345-14-135-1-2345
word turncoat's 2345-1235-1345-14-135-1-2345-3-234
word turncoats 2345-1235-1345-14-135-1-2345-234
word turning 2345-1235-1345-346
word turning's 2345-1235-1345-346-3-234
word turnings 2345-1235-1345-346-234
word turnip 2345-1235-1345-24-1234
word turnpike 2345-1235-1345-1234-24-13-15
word turnpike's 2345-1235-1345-1234-24-13-15-3-234
word turnpikes 2345-1235-1345-1234-24-13-15-234
word turnip's 2345-1235-1345-24-1234-3-234
word turnips 2345-1235-1345-24-1234-234
word turnaround 2345-1235-1345-345-46-145
word turnaround's 2345-1235-1345-345-46-145-3-234
word turnarounds 2345-1235-1345-345-46-145-234
word turner's 2345-1235-1345-12456-3-234
word turners 2345-1235-1345-12456-234
word turn's 2345-1235-1345-3-234
word turns 2345-1235-1345-234
word turnstile 2345-1235-1345-34-24-123-15
word turnstile's 2345-1235-1345-34-24-123-15-3-234
word turnstiles 2345-1235-1345-34-24-123-15-234
word turned 2345-1235-1345-1246
word turnout 2345-1235-1345-1256-2345
word turntable 2345-1235-1345-2345-1-3456
word turntable's 2345-1235-1345-2345-1-3456-3-234
word turntables 2345-1235-1345-2345-1-3456-234
word turnout's 2345-1235-1345-1256-2345-3-234
word turnouts 2345-1235-1345-1256-2345-234
word trust 2345-1235-34
word trustee 2345-1235-34-15-15
word trustier 2345-1235-34-24-12456
word trusty 2345-1235-34-13456
word trustful 2345-1235-34-56-123
word trustfully 2345-1235-34-56-123-123-13456
word trustfulness 2345-1235-34-56-123-56-234
word trustfulness's 2345-1235-34-56-123-56-234-3-234
word trusting 2345-1235-34-346
word trustingly 2345-1235-34-346-123-13456
word trustee's 2345-1235-34-15-15-3-234
word trustees 2345-1235-34-15-15-234
word trusties 2345-1235-34-24-15-234
word trust's 2345-1235-34-3-234
word trusts 2345-1235-34-234
word trusty's 2345-1235-34-13456-3-234
word trustiest 2345-1235-34-24-15-34
word trusted 2345-1235-34-1246
word trustworthier 2345-1235-34-2456-135-1235-1456-24-12456
word trustworthy 2345-1235-34-2456-135-1235-1456-13456
word trustworthiness 2345-1235-34-2456-135-1235-1456-24-56-234
word trustworthiness's 2345-1235-34-2456-135-1235-1456-24-56-234-3-234
word trustworthiest 2345-1235-34-2456-135-1235-1456-24-15-34
word trusteeship 2345-1235-34-15-15-146-24-1234
word trusteeship's 2345-1235-34-15-15-146-24-1234-3-234
word trusteeships 2345-1235-34-15-15-146-24-1234-234
word truth 2345-1235-1456
word truther 2345-1235-1456-12456
word truthful 2345-1235-1456-56-123
word truthfully 2345-1235-1456-56-123-123-13456
word truthfulness 2345-1235-1456-56-123-56-234
word truthfulness's 2345-1235-1456-56-123-56-234-3-234
word truthiness 2345-1235-1456-24-56-234
word truther's 2345-1235-1456-12456-3-234
word truthers 2345-1235-1456-12456-234
word truth's 2345-1235-1456-3-234
word truths 2345-1235-1456-234
word undo 346-145
word undoubted 346-145-136-12-2345-1246
word undoubtedly 346-145-136-12-2345-1246-123-13456
word undocumented 346-145-14-136-56-2345-1246
word undomesticated 346-145-134-15-34-24-14-1-2345-1246
word undoing 346-145-346
word undone 346-145-1345-15
word undoing's 346-145-346-3-234
word undoings 346-145-346-234
word undoes 346-145-15-234
word unjust 346-245
word unjustifiable 346-245-24-124-24-1-3456
word unjustifiably 346-245-24-124-24-1-12-123-13456
word unjustified 346-245-24-124-24-1246
word unjustly 346-245-123-13456
word unlike 346-123
word unlikelier 346-123-123-24-12456
word unlikely 346-123-123-13456
word unlikelihood 346-123-123-24-125-135-135-145
word unlikelihood's 346-123-123-24-125-135-135-145-3-234
word unlikeliness 346-123-123-24-56-234
word unlikeliness's 346-123-123-24-56-234-3-234
word unlikeliest 346-123-123-24-15-34
word unlikeness 346-123-56-234
word unlikeness's 346-123-56-234-3-234
word various 1236-345
word variously 1236-345-123-13456
word value 1236-123
word valuer 1236-123-1235
word valueless 1236-123-46-234
word valuer's 1236-123-1235-3-234
word valuers 1236-123-1235-234
word value's 1236-123-3-234
word values 1236-123-234
word valued 1236-123-145
word valuable 1236-345
word valuable's 1236-345-3-234
word valuables 1236-345-234
word wherefore 156-124
word wherefore's 156-124-3-234
word wherefores 156-124-234
word women 2345-134-26
word womenfolk 2345-134-26-124-135-123-13
word womenfolk's 2345-134-26-124-135-123-13-3-234
word womenfolks 2345-134-26-124-135-123-13-234
word womenfolks's 2345-134-26-124-135-123-13-234-3-234
word women's 2345-134-26-3-234
word woman 2456-134-1345
word womanhood 2456-134-1345-125-135-135-145
word womanhood's 2456-134-1345-125-135-135-145-3-234
word womankind 2456-134-1345-13-35-145
word womankind's 2456-134-1345-13-35-145-3-234
word womanlier 2456-134-1345-123-24-12456
word womanly 2456-134-1345-123-13456
word womanlike 2456-134-1345-123-24-13-15
word womanlike's 2456-134-1345-123-24-13-15-3-234
word womanliness 2456-134-1345-123-24-56-234
word womanliness's 2456-134-1345-123-24-56-234-3-234
word womanliest 2456-134-1345-123-24-15-34
word woman's 2456-134-1345-3-234
word womanish 2456-134-1345-24-146
word womanize 2456-134-1345-24-1356-15
word womanizer 2456-134-1345-24-1356-12456
word womanizing 2456-134-1345-24-1356-346
word womanizer's 2456-134-1345-24-1356-12456-3-234
word womanizers 2456-134-1345-24-1356-12456-234
word womanizes 2456-134-1345-24-1356-15-234
word womanized 2456-134-1345-24-1356-1246
word exceeding 1346-145-346
word exceedingly 1346-145-346-123-13456
